Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-3101
Act, how cited.

Sections 85-3101 to 85-3115 shall be known and may be cited as the Excellence in Teaching Act and shall include the Attracting Excellence to Teaching Program, the Enhancing Excellence in Teaching Program, and the Career-Readiness and Dual-Credit Education Grant Program.

Laws 2000, LB 1399, § 15;

Laws 2009, LB547, § 3;

R.S.1943, (2014), § 79-8,132;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 13.
July 1, 2024